New York, session 2025-2026, A3861.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 1224 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 540 of the laws of 2002, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 2. If an abandoned vehicle, at the time of abandonment, has no number 5 plates affixed and is of a wholesale value, taking into consideration 6 the condition of the vehicle, of [one] three thousand [two hundred 7 fifty] dollars or less, ownership shall immediately vest in the local 8 authority having jurisdiction thereof and title to the vehicle shall 9 vest in accordance with applicable law and regulations of the commis- 10 sioner, provided however that a local authority shall not be required to 11 obtain title to an abandoned vehicle that is subject to the provisions 12 of this subdivision if the vehicle will be sold or otherwise disposed of 13 as junk or salvage, dismantled for use other than as a motor vehicle, or 14 otherwise destroyed. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 16 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02985-01-5